South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S590.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 7, Article III of the Constitution of this State be amended by adding a new paragraph at the end to read: "No person shall be eligible for election to the House of Representatives if that person has served six terms in the same body, regardless of the district represented. No person shall be eligible for election to the Senate if that person has served three terms in the same body, regardless of the district represented. For the purposes of the number of terms served in the General Assembly, any term served, for which the election was held prior to January 1, 2026, shall not be counted as a term served. For the purposes of this section, service in office for more than one half of a term shall be deemed service for a term." SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 7, Article III of the Constitution of this State, relating to the qualifications of members of the Senate and House of representatives, be amended so as to impose term limits on members of the Senate and members of the House of Representatives, so that a member of the Senate may serve no more than three terms in office and a member of the House of Representatives may serve no more than six terms in office? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----